Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.085

World fair commission—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the executive director and one confidential secretary of the world fair commission created in chapter 177, Laws of 1983.

[ 1983 c 177 s 6.]